Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB406.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS 42.205 and 61.691 to the
contrary and subject to the limitations established by this section, recipients of a monthly
retirement allowance from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or State Police
Retirement System who have been retired for at least 12 months shall receive a one-time
supplemental payment added to their July 2026 retirement allowance payment, equal to
the monthly retirement allowance the recipient receives from the system in the month of
June 2026.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$96,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 from the Kentucky Permanent Pension Fund
established by KRS 42.205 to the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority to be applied to
the following funds to prefund the supplemental payment provided by Section 1 of this
Act:
(1) $84,000,000 to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund the supplemental
payment from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for service
in a nonhazardous position as defined in KRS 61.510(44);
(2) $7,000,000 to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund the supplemental
payment from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for service
in a hazardous position as provided in KRS 61.592; and
(3) $5,000,000 to the State Police Retirement Fund of the State Police Retirement
System established by KRS 16.510 to prefund the supplemental payment from the State
Police Retirement System to each recipient.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 1:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1542
Section 3. The Board of Trustees of the County Employees Retirement System
may, by board decision, elect to provide recipients of a monthly retirement allowance
from the County Employees Retirement System who have been retired for at least 12
months a one-time supplemental payment added to their July 2026 retirement allowance
payment, equal to the monthly retirement allowance the recipient receives from the
system in the month of June 2026. If provided, the board shall fund the one-time
supplemental payment by increasing employer contribution rates to the County
Employees Retirement System, effective July 1, 2027, for a one-year or two-year period
as determined by the board to cover the full actuarial cost of the one-time payment.
Section 4. Whereas retired members and beneficiaries of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, and State Police
Retirement System have not received a cost-of-living adjustment to their retirement
allowances since fiscal year 2011-2012, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 1:41 PM Jacketed